Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska90-309
Nebraska State Capitol Environs Commission;
annual meeting; report.

(1) The Nebraska State Capitol Environs
Commission shall meet at least annually with the Nebraska Capitol Commission
to discuss and coordinate projects that may impact the capitol and its surrounding
environs pursuant to section 81-1108.38.

(2) The Nebraska State Capitol Environs Commission shall report each
January to the city council and mayor of the city of Lincoln, to the Legislature,
and to the Governor. The report
submitted to the Legislature shall be submitted electronically. The
report shall review the major decisions rendered during the preceding year
and outline the rationale for the decisions. The report may also survey the
status of the Nebraska State Capitol Environs District and make recommendations
for its enhancement and protection.

Laws 1993, LB 271, § 6;

Laws 1999, LB 297, § 3;

Laws 2012, LB782, § 249.